Florida, session 2026, HB1045.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (j) of subsection (2) and subsection
(3) of section 215.5586, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
215.5586 My Safe Florida Home Program.—There is
established within the Department of Financial Services the My
Safe Florida Home Program. The department shall provide fiscal
accountability, contract management, and strategic leadership
for the program, consistent with this section. This section does
not create an entitlement for property owners or obligate the
state in any way to fund the inspection or retrofitting of
residential property in this state. Implementation of this
program is subject to annual legislative appropriations. It is
the intent of the Legislature that, subject to the availability
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1045-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1045 2026
of funds, the My Safe Florida Home Program provide licensed
inspectors to perform hurricane mitigation inspections of
eligible homes and grants to fund hurricane mitigation projects
on those homes. The department shall implement the program in
such a manner that the total amount of funding requested by
accepted applications, whether for inspections, grants, or other
services or assistance, does not exceed the total amount of
available funds. If, after applications are processed and
approved, funds remain available, the department may accept
applications up to the available amount. The program shall
develop and implement a comprehensive and coordinated approach
for hurricane damage mitigation pursuant to the requirements
provided in this section.
(2) HURRICANE MITIGATION GRANTS.—Financial grants shall be
used by homeowners to make improvements recommended by an
inspection which increase resistance to hurricane damage.
(j) A homeowner who receives a grant shall finalize
construction and request a final inspection, or request an
extension for an additional 6 months, within 1 year after grant
approval. If a homeowner fails to comply with this paragraph,
his or her application is deemed abandoned and the grant money
reverts to the department. The department must notify the
applicant if an application is deemed abandoned. If the
applicant responds to such notification within 5 business days
and demonstrates good cause for the failure to comply with this
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1045-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1045 2026
paragraph, the applicant may submit a subsequent grant
application.
(3) REQUESTS FOR INFORMATION.—The department may request
that an applicant provide additional information. An application
is deemed withdrawn by the applicant if the department does not
receive a response to its request for additional information
within 60 days after the notification of any apparent error or
omission. The department must notify the applicant if an
application has been deemed withdrawn. If the applicant responds
to such notification within 5 business days, demonstrates good
cause for any error or omission, and corrects any error or
omission in that time period, the application may not be deemed
withdrawn.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1045-00